Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB535.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Genetic test." Any of the following: (1) The analysis of deoxyribonucleic acid to identify changes in gene sequence or expression levels.(2) The analysis of ribonucleic acid to determine gene 1234567891011121314151617181920 expression.(3) Biochemical tests for the presence of gene products. (4) Microscopic analysis of chromosomes. * * *Section 2. Section 10.3(c)(1)(iii) and (viii) and (3) of the act are amended to read:Section 10.3. Genetic counselor.* * *(c) Scope of practice.--(1) A genetic counselor may provide genetic counseling to clients, which includes:* * *(iii) Identify, order and coordinate genetic [laboratory] tests [and other diagnostic studies] as appropriate for the genetic assessment.* * *(viii) Provide written documentation of medical, genetic and counseling information for families, referring providers and other appropriate health care professionals and maintain the documentation in the client's medical records.* * *(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize a genetic counselor to diagnose, [test] manage or treat any genetic disease or condition or other disease or condition.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0535PN0527 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728